ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/bg_BG/hyph_bg_BG.dic
гро3мни1т
гром1ни
гро3мни1ят
греб4
4греб1в
г3ре3бва3не
греб1ва
2г1реб2е.
гре1б2е
3греших
гре1ши
1гре1ш2е
гру1
2гм
г1ме
г1б
2г1с
1г2о.
гове1с
го1ве
2г1овее
го1в2ц
го3р2но1т
гор1н
гор1но
горис1
го1ри
го1б
го1сл
гос1ти
го1о1
1г2от
гот1в2
го1ти
гонав1
го1на
го1к
1гоя
4годи1ш2е
го1ди
го1п
го1х
1гласн
4гла1су
г1лат
г1лаш
г1лом
1глим
1глил
г1ли1т
1глих
1гле1не
г1лед1в
3гле3днал.
глед4нал
глед1н
глед1на
3гледнат
3гле3д2нах
г3лед1ни
3гле3д2нем
глед1не
3гле3д2нет
3глед4неш
1гле1ди
1гле1дъ
1глеж
2глу
3глъщ2а.
глъ1щ
глъ1ща
3глъщат
3глъщах
3глъщащ
2г1т
г3на1то
г1на
гна1х2т
г1но1
гнос2
3г2ноз
1ги
ги1о
1ге
ге1ру
ге1с2
1г2у
гу1ре
гу1м
гу1би
1гъ
гъ1сти
г1ън1ц
гъ1ще1
гъ1щ
г2д
2у.
у1а
уа2ла
у4а2ли
ув1л
у1ра
у1р2мо
ур1м
ур3ност4
ур1н
ур1но
у1ри
урис3т2и.
у1ря
ум1р
у2м1л
1ум1ц
у1мя
у1бо
убих3т
уб3егн2е.
уб2е
уб2ег
убег1не
убек2
убе3к1та
у1бъ
у1бя
ус1в
ус1м
ус1л
у1ст2ва
уств2
у1ство
уст1ве
ус1тр
устро4е
усто1я3в
ус1то
ус1ти
у3с2тин1н
ус1тин
ус1ъм
у1съ1ю1
усъюз2
ус1п
успях3м
ус1пя
у1о
уо2с
уос1т
у1ла
у1ле
улес2
у1лъ
у1ля
ут1в2
ут1ре
у1ти
у1тъ
уни3ст2и.
у1ни
у1и2р
уис1
у1и2т
у1ин
у1ич
у1и1з2
у1е
уе2р
уе2л
уг1р
уг1од1н
у1у
уча1и1т
у1ча
уч1р
у1кве
ук1р
укрити2
укри1т
у2кс
ук1л
у1к2та
у1кти
у1ку1
у1къ
у1я1в
у1ят
уд1в
уд1р
уд1но4
уд1н
уднос3т2и.
удно3сти
у3дницат
уд1ни
удни1ц
у3дници1т
уди1хм
у1ди
удес3н
у1де
уз1р
у1зи
у1зе
у1па
уп1ра
упра1в
упо1т
уп1ла
у1пи
у1пе
у1пу
ух3в
ухо3в4нос
у1хо
ухов1н
ухов1но
ух3нах
ух1н
ух1на
у1ф
у1щ
уже1с
у1же
ужест2
2ч.
1ча
час3т2и.
ча3сти1т
час3тие
чак3в
2ч1в
ч4ре1ди
1чо1
ч1ли
ч1т
ч1н
ч3нах
ч1на
ч3но
чно3сти
1чн2е.
ч1не
1чи
чис3ле2н.
чис1ти
чини3х2т
чи1ни
чи1ет
чи1хм
чи1х2т
1че
че1ру
ч1ер1ц
чест3ва
честв2
чест4в2а.
чес3т2вя
чес3ти1т
че3т2ник
че2т1н
чет1ни
че4н.
ч1ех1м
2чеж
3чежни1къ
чеж1н
чеж1ни
чу1ло
чу1г
1чук
чу1ка
чу1до
ч1к2
1ч2ки1ят
1чъ
2к.
1кар.
кара3х2т
ка1ра
1ка2м.
1кал.
кали4с2
ка1ли
калис3ти
1ка2т.
1ка1те
1ка1на
1ка1ни
1ка3не
кан4ц
канци4
ка3н2ц2и.
1каи
1кае
ка3кват
как1в
как1ва
1ка1ц
1каш
1ка1я2т
1ка1д
1ках
ка1хм
ка1ф
1кай1
3к2вар2а.
к1ва
ква1ра
3к2ва1ри
к4ва1те
4ква1ни4
к3вания.
к2ващ
1ква1ща
к1ран
крое3жи
кро1е
крое2ж
кроя4
крояв3ат
кро1я1в
кроя1ва
2к1ри1ф
1кре1та
4крет1но
кре2т1н
1кру
4круше1но
кру1ш2е
к1ръз
к2с2а.
к1с2а
к3со
кс2т
1кс1та
кс3тр
к1с1то
к1сти
к1стъ
к1ск
1ксъ
кс1п
кс1ф
ко1ръ
1ком
ко1бр
ко1б2л
кос2та
кос1ти
ко1си
ко1съ
кооб1
ко1о
ко2т1в2
ко1тр
ко1ти
ко1тъ
1ко1и
1ко1е
ко2ет
1ког
ко1к
1коя
1код
1ко1з2
ко1па
коп1р
ко1по
ко1пи
ко1пъ
ко1х2т
1кой1
1клам
2к1лор.
2к1ло1ра
3клоних
кло1ни
клик2
кли3кв2а.
клик1ва
кли3кн2а.
клик1на
2к1леван
кле1ва
кля3
клят2
2к2т.
к1тр
1к2тол
к1то
к1тив
к1тир
ктиче4ск2и.
к1тич
кти1че
ктиче1ск
к1ту
к1тъ
1кир
1ки1м
кита1х
ки1т
ки1та
1ки1д
1кер
1кет
ке1д
ке1з
1к2у.
ку1в
ку1ро
ку1ре
ку1м
ку1си
кус1к
ку1съ
ку1ло
ку1ли
ку1по
ку1пл
1к2чил
к1чи
1къд
к1д
к1з
ъ1а
ъ4времен1ни
ъ1врем
ъвре1ме
ъвремен1н
ъв1м
ъ1во
ъ1вли
ъв1ле
ъ1ве
ъ2в1к
ъ1въ
ъ1в2з2
ъвзех1
ъ1ра
2ър2св
ър1с
ърт1в2
ъ1ре
ъ1ръ
ъм1р
ъ1мо1
ъ1ми
ъ1ме
ъ1бр
ъ2б1рат2
ъ1бо
ъ1би
ъ1б2е
ъ1бу
ъ1бя
ъс1м
ъ1сл
ъ1с2т2а.
ъс1та
ъста3вл
ъс4тавян
ъста1вя
ъ3ставян2е.
ъставя1не
ъ3с2та1на
ъст1в2
ъс1тр
ъ1с2т2о.
ъс1то
ъ2с1т2т
ъ1си
ъс1ка
ъ1съ
ъ1о
ъот1
ъ1ла
ъ1ле
ъ1лъ
ъ1ю
ъю2зи
ът1в2
ъ3творяв2а.
ът4воря1в
ътво1ря
ътворя1ва
ъ1тр
ъ1т2т
ъ1ти
ъ1ту
ъ1тъ
ънасле3
ъ1на
ънас2
ъна1сл
ъна1с4лед4
ъ1ну
ъ1е
ъг1рад
ъ1граж4
ъгра3жд2а.
ъгра2ж3д
ъграж1да
ъ1гре
ъ1го1
ъ3глас
ъг3ласува1но
ъ4гла1су
ъгласу1в
ъгласу1ва
ъг1ло
ъ3гле1да
ъ1у1
ъ1чу
ъ1ка
ъ1кр
ък1м
ъ1ко1
ък1ла
ък1ло
ъ1к2нал
ък1на
ъ1ки
ъ1ку
ъ1къ
ъд1ра
ъд1ро
ъд1р2и.
ъд1ри1т
ъд1рия
ъ1дре
ъ1до
ъ3д2ни1ка
ъд1н
ъд1ни
ъ1д2ни1ц
ъдей3ст1ви
ъ1де
ъдей1
ъдейс2
ъдей2ст
ъдейств2
ъ1дъ
ъ2д1ът
ъзве3сти
ъ2з1в
ъзве3с1те
ъзве3с2тя.
ъзвес1тя
ъзве3с4тяв2а.
ъзвестя1в
ъзвестя1ва
ъзве3с2тят
ъз1л
ъ1з2л2и.
ъз1ли
ъ1зи
ъ1зе
ъздиг2
ъз1д2
ъз1ди
ъзди3гн2а.
ъздиг1на
ъзди3гнал
ъзди3гна2т.
ъзди3г1не
ъ1па
ъ1пр
ъ4п3роти1ви
ъпро1т
ъ2п1ри
ъ1по
ъпност2
ъп1н
ъп1но
ъпно2с3тт
ъ1пи
ъ1пе
ъ1пъ
ъх1р
ъ1х2н2а.
ъх1н
ъх1на
ъх4но
ъ1щ
ъщнос3ти
ъ2щ1н
ъщ1но
ъ3щ2ни
ъще3ст2ва
ъ1ще
ъществ2
ъще3ство
ъ1жо
ъ1жъ
ъжда1ни2
ъ2ж1д
ъж1да
ъж1де1
1ц
2ц.
цар2с2т2
цар1с
цае2
2ц1л
2ц1т
ц1те1
ц2н
ци2ал.
ци1а
ци2а3ла
ци2а1ле
ци1ме
цис2
ци1сти
ци1ск2
ци1зм2
циф1е
ци1ф
3ц2е.
це1в2
це2лос
це1ло
це1т2в2
це1пи
цу1
2ц1к
ця1
2ш.
1ша
ша3в1н
ша1тр
ша1хме
шах3т
ш1ру
ш1м
1шо
шо1к
шоя2
1шла
1шло
1шли
шлено2с3тт
шленост4
шле1но
ш1ля
ш2т
2ш1н
1ши
шително2с3тт
ши1т
ши1те
шител1н
шителност4
шител1но
ши1но1
ши1ет
3шия
ши1з2
ши1хм
ши1х2т
1ш2е
ше3ст1ва
шеств2
шес1ти
ше1х
1шу
2ш1к
1шъ
я1в
я2вл
я1ра
яр1о
я1ри
ямах1м
я1ма
яма1х2т
я1ме
я1мъ
яс1л
яс1ти
4ясняван
яс1ня
ясня1в
ясня1ва
яс1к
я1съ
яс1ът
я1ла
я1ло
я1ли
я1ти
ятел4н2о.
я1те
ятел1н
ятел1но
ятел4н2и.
ятел1ни
я1тъ
ян2ст1ва
я2н1с
янст2
янств2
янос1
я1но
яност2
1ян1н
я1ем
я1еш
я1ех
я1ещ
я1го
я1к
я2к1л
1яя
яд1р
я2де
яд1еш
я1дъ
я4зал.
я1за
я2за2н.
я1зе
ях3в
я1х2т
я3ще
4ящем
я1же1
яжест2
2д.
1да
3дават
да1ва
дас1
да3н2ни1т
дан1н
дан1ни
да1че1
да1кти
дак1т
дадох3т
да1до
3дах
да1хм
д3ва2н.
д1ва
д1вор1н
1дво1ре
д1вл
1дви1да
д1ви
дву1
драв1л
драст2
д1ром
д1ри3а
д3рио3
д1рин
д1рид
д1рес
дре1к
1дре2д.
д1ред1б
д1ре1ди
д1ре1де
д1реж
1дръ
1д2м2а.
д1ма
1д2ма1ми
д2мо1к
д1мо
д1м2и.
д1ми1т
д1мия.
1дми1ят
д1ме
1д2ме2т1н
д1б
д1с2
дст2
дс1та1
1д2сиг
1д2о.
до1вл
1дор
до1мъ
до1б
до2бл
до1сл
дос4та1ве
дос1та
дос1тр
дости3г4на1ли
достиг1на
дос1тъ
дос1к
дол2
до1л1на
дол1н
до1л1ни
1до1т
до3на
донесо4х3м
до1не
доне1со
до1е2
до1г
до1к
1до1ш
1дод
до1п
доп4р
до3преде1ли
до2п1ре
допре1де
до3преде1ля
допус1
до1х2р
до1ф
1дой1
до2ж3и1ве
до1жи
д1ло
д1ли
д1ле
д2та
д1то1
дточ2
д1ти
д1н
1д2на1то
д1на
дназ3
дна1х2т
3д2но3с2т1н
д1но
дно3сти
д2но1г2о.
дно1го1
дничест3
д1ни
дни1че
1д2нея
д1не
1ди
3ди1ви
ди1сл
ди1сти
ди1ска
диск2
ди1ско
ди1о2н
дителнос3
ди1т
ди1те
дител1н
дител1но
дини3х2т
ди1ни
ди1ет
ди1гр
диг3на1ти
диг1на
диг3нах
ди1у2
ди1че1
2диз
3дизвика1но
ди2з3в
диз1ви
дизви1ка
3дизви1ка1ни
д1изве
ди1зм2
3ди1зе
1де
де1в
де1ми
дест1в2
дест2вя
дес2ни
де3сни1т
де3сния
дес1п
де1тр
денос3ти
де1но
де1и1т
де1ет
дек1р
де1к1с2а
де1кл
де1хм
де1ф
дефе1
де1жъ
д1г
д2гон
д3го1ни
1дго1не
1ду
ду1в
ду1ми
ду1ли
ду1е2
дух2
ду3хнат
дух1н
дух1на
ду1х1не
д1ч
д1к
дъ1б
дъ2б1р
дъс1
1дът
дъх4н
дъ3хна2х.
дъх1на
дъ3ж2да
дъ2ж1д
д1ш
дшест2
д1ш2е
дше3ствени1ц
дше4ст1ве
дшеств2
дшестве1ни
1дя
дя1д
дя1хм
д1д
д1з
д2зн
д1п
дпре1
дпред2
дпос3
д4по4ла4г2а.
дпо1ла
дпола1г
дпола1га
д2пи1с2а
4д3пис2а.
1д2пи1ш2е
д1х2в
д1хр
3дхранва3не
д4хранван
дхран1в
дхран1ва
1д2ж
2дж1м
1дь
2з.
1за
за1вр
зав1ле
за1вт
заме4н2и.
за1ме
заме1ни
зас2
за1сл
за1ст
за1о1
зат2
за1тв2
зае2та
за1ет
зае2ти
за1к
заци4я
за1ц
за1др
за1дл
за3з2
за3хр
за1хм
за1х2т
2з1в
з2воли1т
зво1ли
3зволител
зволи1те
3з2вищ2е.
з1ви
зви1щ
зви1ще
звес3тие
звър4н
звъ3рна1та
звър1на
звъ3рна1ти
звъ3рна1ха
з1ра
зра2с3т2т
зра3ст2е.
зрас1те
з2рат
зрад2
зра3дв2а.
зрад1в
зрад1ва
з1ро
2зрее
зрек1л
з1ред
з1ру
зря1хм
зм2
з2м2а.
з1ма
з1мр
з1мн
з1мив
з1мир
з1мис
зми3сл2и.
зми3сли1т
змис3ле
з1мил
з1мий1
з1ме
з4мен1но
змен1н
зме4н2и.
зме1ни
з1му
з1мъ
з2мът
з1мя
з1б
збав1л
з1ба
збръ1
збръс2
з1с2
зс4то3яния
зс1то
зстоя1ни
зстъ1
1з2о.
з1о1б
з4обра1зи
зо2б3ра1зи1т
зо2б4н
3з2о3бно1ве
зоб1но
зос2
зос3ти
зот1в2
зо1ти
1зон
зо1г
з1оч
зо1п
з1опа
1зох
з1лю
з1ли
з1ле
зле3з2е.
злез3ем
злез3еш
з1лъ
з1ля
1зю1
з1т2
зтер2
з1те
зтерз1
зт2ег1
зте1к
зна4г
з1на
знаг3ра1ди
знаг3раде2н.
знагра1де
зна1х2т
з2най1
зност2
з1но
зно2с3тт
з3не
з1ну1
1з2и.
1зир
зи1ме
2з1ис
зи1о
1зи1т
1зин
зи1ет
зи1г
зи1ко
1зия
1зи1д
зи1х2т
зе1ми
зес1
1зен
зе1х1те
зех2т
з1г2
3зглед2а.
згле1да
1зув
з1у2м.
з1у1ма
зу1ми
зу1ме
з1у1мъ
з1ус
1зул
зу1ко
з1уз
з1у1п
з1ч
зчес3ти
з1че
зчув1
з1к
1зъ
1з2ци
з1ц
1з2ш2е
1зя.
зя3в
з1я1р
з1яс
3з4ясняван
зяс1ня
зясня1в
зясня1ва
з1я2л
1зят
з1яд
з1яж
з1д2
з2д3ни
зд1н
з1з
з1п2
зпа3дн2а.
зпад1н
зпад1на
зпри1
зповед3т
зпо1ве
зпоз3
з3пл
зпита3хм
зпи1т
зпи1та
зпус1
з1х
з1щ
з1ж
2п.
1п2а.
1пав
пас1ти
па3тр
патих1
па1ти
1пан
1пае
пае1ми
па1ем
1пая
1пах
1пай1
2п1в
2пра1ва
4правляван
правля1
правля1в
правля1ва
4правян
пра1вя
4проти1ви
про1т
2при3не
п4реч2и.
пре1чи
пръ3сти
2пс
п1ст
п1ск
1п2о.
по1вл
пов3д
по1ръ
по1мр
по1б
по2бл
побър3к3
по1сме
пос3луж
пос2т
по4с3т2а.
пос1та
по4с4тави1т
поста1ви
по1стр
по4ст3о2в
пос1то
по2ст4т
по3сти
по4ст2и.
по4сти1т
по1стъ
по1си
по1ск
поско2
по1съ
по1тв2
по3то
по1тъ
по3на
по1н2ц
понци2
пое1м
по1е
по1гр
по3гле2д.
по3гле1да
по3гле3днат
поглед1н
поглед1на
по3гле3д4неш
поглед1не
по1к
по1д1не
под1н
подей3
по1де
по1п
1п2л2а.
п1ла2в.
1пл2о.
п1лож
2плю
1плин
2п1линир
пли1ни
п1лия
плек2
пле3к1та
пю1
2пт
п2тат
п1та
п1тр
пти3сти
п1ту
п1тъ
п1н
п4ни2к.
п1ни
п4ници1т
пни1ц
1п2и.
п2ир
пис1т
пис3н
пис1к2
пи1о
1пил
п1итъ
пи1т
1пие
пи1ет
1пия
пи2я1ни
пи1ян
пи1з
пи1хм
пе1ру
пес1т
пес4н
пе1тр
пе1т2т
1пен
пе1ет
пе3кт2и.
1пед
пу1съ
пулаци2
пу1ла
пула1ц
пу1ка
2пч
2п1к
3п1ка3не
п2кв
пъс1
п1ъл1ч
пъ1к2
п2ш
1пя
2п1ф
2х.
1ха
ха1о2
ха1и
х2в
хра3сти
4хранван
хран1в
хран1ва
1хр2и.
х3ри2с2т.
3хри3с1та
х3рис1тъ
1хре
х1ру
1хря
хс2
1хо
хов4нос
хов1н
хов1но
хо1ръ
хо1тв2
хо1т2т
хо1к
хо1п
3хож
х1лю
х1ли
х1ле1ти
3хлетят
хле1тя
3хлетях
х2т
х3ти
х1н
1х2н2о.
х1но
3хнове3на
хно1ве
3х1нове1но
3хновени1т
хнове1ни
хно3сти
1хи
хи1а1
хи2и
хи1з2
хе1ру
хе1м
х1ес
х1ул1в
ху1ли
ху1д
х1к
1хъ
2ф.
1ф2а.
фа1б
фак1л
фра1с
фре2
ф1с
фст2
фо1си
ф2он
фо1к
2ф1ли1ка
фю1
2ф1т
ф1н
1ф2и.
1фия
фи1з
1фий1
фе1с1та
фе1с1тъ
фек3ти1т
ф1г
1фъ
1фя
1фь
й1
ймал2
й1ма
йс2
й2ст
йст4вай.
йств2
йст1ва
йствай1
й3ство
йст4вие
йст1ви
йст3ву
1й2о
й3оф
й2л1н
йно4с
й1но
йничест3
й1ни
йни1че
й2е1
йго2
йго1ле2
1й2ъ
йдо2б
йдобро2
йдо1х2т
й2п2
2щ.
1ща
щас1ти
ща2т1ъ
щ1ри
щ1ря
1що
що1п
1щ2т
2щ1н
1щи
3щи1т
щи1ет
1ще
ще1вр
щест2ва
ществ2
ще1но1
щед1ри
1щу
щу1к
щ1к
2щ1ъ
1щя
1жа
жа1н2ц
жанци2
жае2ма
жа1ем
жа1хм
жа1х2т
ж1в
ж1м
ж1б
жо1в2ни
жов1н
ж1ли
ж2та
ж1н
ж3но4с
ж1но
жнос3т2и.
жно3ст3и1т
3жняванет
ж1ня
жня1в
жня1ва
жнява3не
1жи
жително2с3тт
жи1т
жи1те
жител1н
жителност4
жител1но
жи1ет
жи1хм
жи1х2т
1же
же1св
жест2ва
жеств2
же1сти
жет2
же1т1в2
же3не
же1д
же1хм
же1х2т
жун2
2ж1к
ж3ка
1жък
2ж1д
3ж2дов2е.
ждо1ве
ж2д1н
3ж2дия
ж1ди
жден4
ж1де
3ж2дени1ц
жде1ни
3ж2дъ
ьо2р1и1т2
ьо1ри
